output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
око/AA
описати/AB
никто/AD
тежкы/AE
великы/AF
олово/AH
атака/AC
амбасада/AC
писати/AB
инокто/AD
покрывати/AG
бариера/AC
музика/AC
буда/AC
инженјерство/AH
дуга/AC
литература/AC
покушати/AG
лука/AC
желєзо/AH
туберкулоза/AC
освобаджати/AG
сова/AC
одплата/AC
побуджати/AG
планета/AC
чловєчство/AH
виза/AC
изражати/AG
гроза/AC
скала/AC
учестничство/AH
клјувати/AG
процедура/AC
корона/AC
математика/AC
награда/AC
написати/AB
махати/AG
ураза/AC
одврачати/AG
противдєјство/AH
рабство/AH
краса/AC
показывати/AG
одвргати/AG
низина/AC
просба/AC
работати/AG
решта/AC
купа/AC
система/AC
мєзга/AC
одвага/AC
мєлкы/AE
оглашати/AG
температура/AC
косово/AH
цєна/AC
тенкы/AE
обезглавјати/AG
малина/AC
христијанство/AH
увєрјати/AG
фигура/AC
централа/AC
обсвєтлјати/AG
характеристика/AC
всекто/AD
забранјати/AG
врана/AC
звєзда/AC
злоупотрєбјати/AG
принуджати/AG
книга/AC
могыла/AC
мєра/AC
подзрєвати/AG
губа/AC
подкопывати/AG
пила/AC
чесати/AB
равнина/AC
срєбро/AH
захвачати/AG
бездна/AC
порно/AH
колбаса/AC
горкы/AE
изтирати/AG
вєра/AC
брада/AC
доставати/AG
влада/AC
кава/AC
играти/AG
груда/AC
машина/AC
мама/AC
нафта/AC
обожати/AG
метода/AC
договарјати/AG
жена/AC
утрачати/AG
премиера/AC
разтегати/AG
злато/AH
подписати/AB
синтакса/AC
позвалјати/AG
опека/AC
задоволјство/AH
сумнєвати/AG
забава/AC
спознати/AG
хвороба/AC
изчезати/AG
судба/AC
раздавати/AG
одстати/AG
прєдпочитати/AG
пружина/AC
повєдати/AG
вєшати/AG
крєпкы/AE
газета/AC
нєкто/AD
дозрєти/AG
составјати/AG
сестринство/AH
плата/AC
притискати/AG
хлапство/AH
одстрашати/AG
језыковєдство/AH
монета/AC
поправјати/AG
различати/AG
словјанство/AH
кривовєрство/AH
соната/AC
натискати/AG
дєтинство/AH
сєно/AH
выдра/AC
супроваджати/AG
суработничство/AH
совєтничство/AH
посрєдничство/AH
увага/AC
затварјати/AG
надигрывати/AG
одвивати/AG
пробивати/AG
суработати/AG
противдєјати/AG
начинати/AG
списати/AB
записати/AB
прєписати/AB
обдарјати/AG
пријати/AG
разламывати/AG
снижати/AG
руда/AC
зачрвенјати/AG
разгледати/AG
екипа/AC
неспокојство/AH
мароко/AH
пытати/AG
дєвичство/AH
прєважати/AG
накладати/AG
народобијство/AH
родобијство/AH
духовенство/AH
вписати/AB
прємєшчати/AG
растлина/AC
прєдсєдателјство/AH
вставати/AG
доказывати/AG
дузина/AC
дворјанство/AH
граджанство/AH
истина/AC
издумати/AG
изработывати/AG
јединство/AH
клиентство/AH
лјудство/AH
маленјкы/AE
младечство/AH
молва/AC
обговарјати/AG
одсутство/AH
оплакывати/AG
овєрјати/AG
пижама/AC
подкупство/AH
поручати/AG
прєображати/AG
природа/AC
присутство/AH
радничство/AH
разискати/AG
работничство/AH
родство/AH
рыболовство/AH
смечкати/AG
соучестничство/AH
спокојство/AH
сутрудничство/AH
супруга/AC
тепло/AH
уставати/AG
виноградство/AH
водителјство/AH
водство/AH
всаджати/AG
заблуда/AC
заплєнјати/AG
здравотничство/AH
бочва/AC
лјудобијство/AH
натипкати/AG
порота/AC
придумати/AG
теплота/AC
усложнјати/AG
виолина/AC
одпрашати/AG
снабдєвати/AG
устати/AG
земједєлство/AH
прєразказывати/AG
замєшивати/AG
азбука/AC
авторство/AH
богослужба/AC
доба/AC
двуженство/AH
дышати/AG
гыбкы/AE
једнобожство/AH
клима/AC
кусати/AG
лјудоједство/AH
многобожство/AH
нуда/AC
одчинјати/AG
опекунство/AH
побєджати/AG
прєставати/AG
приписати/AB
проживати/AG
рана/AC
сближати/AG
шуба/AC
трајати/AG
творчество/AH
устројство/AH
воздухоплавство/AH
изгнанство/AH
задрємати/AG
жаркы/AE
хунта/AC
безпокојство/AH
хипноза/AC
једноженство/AH
јестество/AH
језыкознавство/AH
кривоприсежничство/AH
надувати/AG
поискывати/AG
возбогачати/AG
акула/AC
мєшчанство/AH
одбивати/AG
прилога/AC
вникати/AG
картина/AC
морјеплавство/AH
попруга/AC
спасати/AG
нарєкати/AG
посада/AC
привезывати/AG
првородство/AH
рукодєлство/AH
обработати/AG
прєдстава/AC
одстранјати/AG
тргати/AG
притворство/AH
природовєдство/AH
производство/AH
повєрјати/AG
мексико/AH
сварјати/AG
подслушивати/AG
марихуана/AC
шарлатанство/AH
природознавство/AH
звєздознавство/AH
лјудожерство/AH
обжерство/AH
звєздарство/AH
одклјучати/AG
сода/AC
лєпкы/AE
клејкы/AE
виола/AC
срака/AC
кухарство/AH
джудо/AH
молекула/AC
печетарство/AH
тискарство/AH
драма/AC
закашлјати/AG
покрчати/AG
западати/AG
агава/AC
акушерство/AH
авангарда/AC
баронеса/AC
бордо/AH
бренчати/AG
брно/AH
дєтство/AH
дєвство/AH
долгота/AC
гама/AC
глодати/AG
гонитва/AC
икава/AC
изткати/AG
јаркы/AE
јела/AC
калина/AC
копа/AC
крєхкы/AE
кртовина/AC
квокати/AG
лајно/AH
лєпота/AC
лукавство/AH
лушчина/AC
материнство/AH
млатба/AC
млєзиво/AH
монако/AH
мрчати/AG
напајати/AG
навага/AC
нємєти/AG
непријателјство/AH
обогатєти/AG
очишчати/AG
одписати/AB
одтєкати/AG
окрајина/AC
обнјухати/AG
освєчати/AG
парализа/AC
прєлјубство/AH
разчесати/AB
раздєти/AG
разкрывати/AG
пукати/AG
разтрата/AC
разтрєскати/AG
тинктура/AC
тонкы/AE
вендета/AC
витрина/AC
зараза/AC
изцєлјати/AG
бала/AC
анамнеза/AC
лихварство/AH
сарајево/AH
мученичство/AH
намылјати/AG
казарна/AC
конго/AH
пиратство/AH
каперство/AH
мандолина/AC
измєтати/AG
потомство/AH
урна/AC
намашчати/AG
декадентство/AH
прєрастати/AG
блокфлејта/AC
измагателјство/AH
посрєбрјати/AG
сауна/AC
затмєвати/AG
самохвалство/AH
разладжати/AG
разтоптывати/AG
одпилјати/AG
пилина/AC
омлєвати/AG
трєзвєти/AG
бракониерство/AH
мимика/AC
разплывати/AG
негыбкы/AE
гостепријемство/AH
суперничство/AH
холера/AC
грнчарство/AH
супердржава/AC
прєодєвати/AG
празднина/AC
прєдписати/AB
афера/AC
диета/AC
прєдавство/AH
присегати/AG
крипта/AC
пијанство/AH
униформа/AC
пчеларство/AH
стодола/AC
норма/AC
тесати/AB
позвати/AG
граната/AC
касета/AC
изслушивати/AG
аура/AC
октава/AC
плјускати/AG
туга/AC
